lexc/verb/enhuigea.lexc
LEXICON Casemelyabrandit
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case1melyabrandit
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae2mely§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igeo2mely§l         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§oe2mely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae2mely§n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§ess§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§oe2mely§tt§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§oe2mely§tt§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§oe2mely§tt§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§oe2mely§tt§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§oe2mely§tt§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§oe2mely§tt§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae2mely§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§ae2mely§n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2mely§n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igeamely§§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§oe2mely§tt§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2mely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerbbekit
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repbekit;

LEXICON Verb
algamentesít AddVerbbekit;
atkamentesít AddVerbbekit;
bencésít AddVerbbekit;
betűzhetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
bivalyerősít AddVerbbekit;
borízűsít AddVerbbekit;
béleletlenít AddVerbbekit;
büntetésmentesít AddVerbbekit;
bővizűsít AddVerbbekit;
cementesít AddVerbbekit;
csehesít AddVerbbekit;
csepergősít AddVerbbekit;
csibészít AddVerbbekit;
csoportmentesít AddVerbbekit;
csúszásmentesít AddVerbbekit;
címezetlenít AddVerbbekit;
derűsít AddVerbbekit;
doktrinerít AddVerbbekit;
délcegít AddVerbbekit;
díszítetlenít AddVerbbekit;
dörgedelmesít AddVerbbekit;
egyedít AddVerbbekit;
egyenértékűsít AddVerbbekit;
egyidejűsít AddVerbbekit;
egyszálbélűsít AddVerbbekit;
egértelenít AddVerbbekit;
ellenesít AddVerbbekit;
elsőrendűsít AddVerbbekit;
elévülhetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
emberiesít AddVerbbekit;
emlősít AddVerbbekit;
engedékenyít AddVerbbekit;
eredményesít AddVerbbekit;
erődít AddVerbbekit;
esetlegesít AddVerbbekit;
eszményít AddVerbbekit;
ezredévesít AddVerbbekit;
fantomszerűsít AddVerbbekit;
fehérít AddVerbbekit;
feledékenyít AddVerbbekit;
fellegtelenít AddVerbbekit;
fenolmentesít AddVerbbekit;
fertelmesít AddVerbbekit;
fesztelenít AddVerbbekit;
fineszesít AddVerbbekit;
forgalomképtelenít AddVerbbekit;
félelmesít AddVerbbekit;
fényesít AddVerbbekit;
földetlenít AddVerbbekit;
fönségesít AddVerbbekit;
fülkésít AddVerbbekit;
füzesít AddVerbbekit;
gennyesít AddVerbbekit;
gyantamentesít AddVerbbekit;
gyermektelenít AddVerbbekit;
gyöngít AddVerbbekit;
gyűlöletesít AddVerbbekit;
gólerősít AddVerbbekit;
görögösít AddVerbbekit;
hajszálcsövesít AddVerbbekit;
hederít AddVerbbekit;
helytelenít AddVerbbekit;
hideglelősít AddVerbbekit;
hitelképesít AddVerbbekit;
hézagmentesít AddVerbbekit;
hüvelyesít AddVerbbekit;
idegenít AddVerbbekit;
időtlenít AddVerbbekit;
ijedősít AddVerbbekit;
ingerlékenyít AddVerbbekit;
ismeretesít AddVerbbekit;
jegyesít AddVerbbekit;
jellegtelenít AddVerbbekit;
játékfilmesít AddVerbbekit;
kedvetlenít AddVerbbekit;
kehesít AddVerbbekit;
keményszívűsít AddVerbbekit;
keresetképtelenít AddVerbbekit;
kertesít AddVerbbekit;
kevélyít AddVerbbekit;
kisebbít AddVerbbekit;
klipesít AddVerbbekit;
koravénít AddVerbbekit;
krémesít AddVerbbekit;
kénkövesít AddVerbbekit;
képletesít AddVerbbekit;
késedelmesít AddVerbbekit;
kézbesít AddVerbbekit;
költőiesít AddVerbbekit;
könyörületesít AddVerbbekit;
kötetlenít AddVerbbekit;
közhelyesít AddVerbbekit;
közömbösít AddVerbbekit;
külterjesít AddVerbbekit;
legesít AddVerbbekit;
leküzdhetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
lepkésít AddVerbbekit;
levesít AddVerbbekit;
lágyszívűsít AddVerbbekit;
léktelenít AddVerbbekit;
létesít AddVerbbekit;
melegigényesít AddVerbbekit;
menetrendesít AddVerbbekit;
mesterségesít AddVerbbekit;
mocsármentesít AddVerbbekit;
muszlimellenesít AddVerbbekit;
méregerősít AddVerbbekit;
műszeresít AddVerbbekit;
naprakészít AddVerbbekit;
nemmágnesesít AddVerbbekit;
nemzőképtelenít AddVerbbekit;
nyavalyatörősít AddVerbbekit;
nyűhetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
népszerűtlenít AddVerbbekit;
növénymentesít AddVerbbekit;
oldóképesít AddVerbbekit;
parazitamentesít AddVerbbekit;
pelyhesít AddVerbbekit;
peremtelenít AddVerbbekit;
piacképesít AddVerbbekit;
pormentesít AddVerbbekit;
pápaszemesít AddVerbbekit;
pépesít AddVerbbekit;
raplisít AddVerbbekit;
rejtélyesít AddVerbbekit;
rendíthetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
rezdít AddVerbbekit;
rosszízűsít AddVerbbekit;
részegesít AddVerbbekit;
rézmentesít AddVerbbekit;
röhejesít AddVerbbekit;
savómentesít AddVerbbekit;
sekélyít AddVerbbekit;
serényít AddVerbbekit;
simlisít AddVerbbekit;
stílszerűsít AddVerbbekit;
szalmonellamentesít AddVerbbekit;
szelesít AddVerbbekit;
szembesít AddVerbbekit;
személytelenít AddVerbbekit;
szennyvízmentesít AddVerbbekit;
szeplősít AddVerbbekit;
szertelenít AddVerbbekit;
szivárgásmentesít AddVerbbekit;
szégyenít AddVerbbekit;
szépségesít AddVerbbekit;
szövegesít AddVerbbekit;
szükségtelenít AddVerbbekit;
sármentesít AddVerbbekit;
süllyeszthetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
tankönyvesít AddVerbbekit;
tejszínesít AddVerbbekit;
teljesíthetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
terjedelmesít AddVerbbekit;
termősít AddVerbbekit;
tetszőlegesít AddVerbbekit;
tevősít AddVerbbekit;
téeszesít AddVerbbekit;
tömít AddVerbbekit;
tükrösít AddVerbbekit;
tűzveszélyesít AddVerbbekit;
vesekövesít AddVerbbekit;
viselhetetlenít AddVerbbekit;
véresít AddVerbbekit;
zendít AddVerbbekit;
zöngétlenít AddVerbbekit;
ékezetmentesít AddVerbbekit;
élénkít AddVerbbekit;
értékesít AddVerbbekit;
ízesít AddVerbbekit;
öregít AddVerbbekit;
ügyesít AddVerbbekit;
őrizetlenít AddVerbbekit;
